District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.123

Proclamation of revocation; effect of publication; extension of term of existence.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 230, ch. 269, § 123
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 85-254, § 31
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-81, § 3, 29 DCR 156
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 29(a), 43 DCR 530
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-185, § 2(f), 43 DCR 4510
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.123.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.24.
1973 Ed., § 29-938.
Preparation and payment of appropriate taxes: Section 2(i) of D.C. Law 11-185 provides that nothing in the act shall be construed or interpreted as repealing or affecting any requirement of a domestic or foreign corporation to prepare and submit annual tax forms, or to pay any appropriate District or federal taxes, as provided in accordance with the laws of the District of Columbia or the United States.